Triple2Graph/Brown2F.lexc
! Brown2F.lexc !
!
! Author(s): Damir Cavar,
! Date: 06/15/2017
! Purpose:
!
! Copyright 2017 by Damir Cavar,
!
! Licensed under the Apache License, Version 2.0 (the "License");
! you may not use this file except in compliance with the License.
! You may obtain a copy of the License at
!
!   http://www.apache.org/licenses/LICENSE-2.0
!
! Unless required by applicable law or agreed to in writing, software
! distributed under the License is distributed on an "AS IS" BASIS,
! WITHOUT WARRANTIES OR CONDITIONS OF ANY KIND, either express or implied.
! See the License for the specific language governing permissions and
! limitations under the License.



Multichar_Symbols +N +V +P +Aux +Art +Pron +Dem +Def +Refl +Indef +Pres +PastPart +Past +PresPart +PretPres +1P +2P +3P +Sg +Pl +Q +Neg +Intens +Emph +Countable +Uncountable +Mass +Comparative +Superlative +NELanguage +NECountry +Arch +Poet +Formal +Informal +Dialect +Abbrev +Masc +Fem +Neut +Acc +Nom +Dat +Time +Place +Law +Indian +Sports +Spanish +Foreign


LEXICON Root
+Adv:ABL% quite # ;
+Pron+PreQuant:ABN% all # ;
+Pron+PreQuant:ABN% half # ;
+Pron+PreQuant:ABN% many # ;
+Pron+PreQuant:ABN% nary # ;
+Pron+PreQuant:ABX% both # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% many # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% other # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% next # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% more # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% last # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% former # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% little # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% several # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% enough # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% least # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% only # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% very # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% few # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% fewer # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% past # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% same # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% last # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% latter # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% less # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% single # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% plenty # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% 'nough # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% lesser # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% certain # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% various # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% manye # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% next-to-last # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% particular # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% final # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% previous # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% present # ;
+Pron+PostQuant:AP% nuf # ;
+Pron+PostQuant+Neg:AP$% other's # ;
+Art+Indef:AT% an # ;
+Art+Indef:AT% a # ;
+Art+Def:AT% the # ;
+Det+Neg:AT% no # ;
+Det+Quant+CompN-Sg:AT% every # ;
+Art+Def:AT% th' # ;
+Det+Quant+PrecedeN-Sg:AT% ever' # ;
+Pron+Dialect+Arch:AT% ye # ;
!AP', 'AP AP+AP% many-much # ;'), ('many', 'much')),
+Det:AP% many # ;
+Pron:AP% many # ;
+Adj:AP% many # ;
+Det:AP% much # ;
+Pron:AP% much # ;
+Pron+FollowNeg:AP% much # ;
+Aux+Bare+Inf:BE% be # ;
+Aux+Bare+Imp:BE% be # ;
+Aux+2P+Sg+Past:BED% were # ;
+Aux+1P+Pl+Past:BED% were # ;
+Aux+2P+Pl+Past:BED% were # ;
+Aux+3P+Pl+Past:BED% were # ;
+Aux+1P+Pl+Past+Neg:BED*% weren't # ;
+Aux+2P+Sg+Past+Neg:BED*% weren't # ;
+Aux+2P+Pl+Past+Neg:BED*% weren't # ;
+Aux+3P+Pl+Past+Neg:BED*% weren't # ;
+Aux+3P+Sg+Past:BEDZ% was # ;
+Aux+1P+SG+Past:BEDZ% was # ;
+Aux+1P+Sg+Past+Neg:BEDZ*% wasn't # ;
+Aux+3P+Sg+Past+Neg:BEDZ*% wasn't # ;
+Aux+PresPart:BEG% being # ;
+Aux+1P+Sg+Pres:BEM% am # ;
+Aux+Neg:BEM*% ain't # ;
+Aux+PastPart:BEN% been # ;
+Aux+2P+Sg+Pres+Arch+Dialect:BER% art # ;
+Aux+2P+Sg+Pres:BER% are # ;
+Aux+1P+Pl+Pres+Arch+Dialect:BER% art # ;
+Aux+2P+Pl+Pres+Arch+Dialect:BER% art # ;
+Aux+3P+Pl+Pres+Arch+Dialect:BER% art # ;
+Aux+1P+Pl+Pres:BER% are # ;
+Aux+2P+Pl+Pres:BER% are # ;
+Aux+3P+Pl+Pres:BER% are # ;
+Aux+2P+Sg+Pres+Neg:BER*% ain't # ;
+Aux+2P+Sg+Pres+Neg:BER*% aren't # ;
+Aux+1P+Pl+Pres+Neg:BER*% ain't # ;
+Aux+2P+Pl+Pres+Neg:BER*% ain't # ;
+Aux+3P+Pl+Pres+Neg:BER*% ain't # ;
+Aux+1P+Pl+Pres+Neg:BER*% aren't # ;
+Aux+2P+Pl+Pres+Neg:BER*% aren't # ;
+Aux+3P+Pl+Pres+Neg:BER*% aren't # ;
+Aux+3P+Sg+Pres:BEZ% is # ;
+Aux+3P+Sg+Pres+Neg:BEZ*% isn't # ;
+Aux+3P+Sg+Pres+Neg:BEZ*% ain't # ;
+Conj+Coord:CC% and # ;
+Conj+Coord:CC% or # ;
+Conj+Coord:CC% but # ;
+Conj+Coord:CC% plus # ;
+Conj+Coord:CC% & # ;
+Conj+Coord:CC% either # ;
+Conj+Coord+Neg:CC% neither # ;
+Conj+Coord+Neg:CC% nor # ;
+Conj+Coord:CC% yet # ;
+Conj+Coord:CC% 'n' # ;
+Conj+Coord:CC% and/or # ;
+Conj+Coord:CC% minus # ;
+Conj+Coord:CC% an' # ;
+Num+Card:CD% zero # ;
+Num+Card+Arch:CD% naught # ;
+Num+Card+Arch:CD% nought # ;
+Num+Card+Arch:CD% aught # ; ! mid-number is 0, as in "thirty-aught-six", the .30-06 Springfield rifle cartridge
+Num+Card:CD% oh # ; ! used when spelling numbers (like telephone, bank account, bus line [British: bus route])
+Num+Card:CD% nil # ; ! in general sport scores, British usage ("The score is two–nil.")
+Num+Card:CD% nothing # ; ! in general sport scores, American usage ("The score is two–nothing.")
+Num+Card:CD% null # ; ! used technically to refer to an object or idea related to nothingness. The 0th aleph number ( ℵ 0 {\displaystyle \aleph _{0}} \aleph _{0}) is pronounced "aleph-null".
+Num+Card+Sports:CD% love # ; ! in tennis, badminton, squash and similar sports
+Num+Card+Informal:zilch # ; ! used informally
+Num+Card+Informal+Spanish+Foreign:nada # ; ! (from Spanish) used informally
+Num+Card+Informal:zip # ; ! used informally
+Num+Card:nix # ; ! also used as a verb; mostly American usage
+Num+Card+Arch:cypher # ; ! archaic, from French chiffre, in turn from Arabic sifr, meaning zero
+Num+Card+Arch:cipher # ; ! archaic, from French chiffre, in turn from Arabic sifr, meaning zero
+Num+Card+Informal:goose% egg # ;! 0 (informal)
+Num+Card+Sports:duck # ; ! (used in cricket when a batsman is dismissed without scoring)
+Num+Card:blank # ; ! the half of a domino tile with no pips
+Num+Card:CD% Numerals9 # ;
+Num+Card+Val-10:CD% ten # ;
+Num+Card+Val-11:CD% eleven # ;
+Num+Card+Val-12:CD% twelve # ;
+Num+Card+Val-12:CD% a% dozen # ;
+Num+Card+Val-13:CD% thirteen # ;
+Num+Card+Val-14:CD% fourteen # ;
+Num+Card+Val-15:CD% fifteen # ;
+Num+Card+Val-16:CD% sixteen # ;
+Num+Card+Val-17:CD% seventeen # ;
+Num+Card+Val-18:CD% eighteen # ;
+Num+Card+Val-19:CD% nineteen # ;
+Num+Card:CD% NumeralTeens # ;
+Num+Card:CD% NumeralTeens - Numerals9 # ;
+Num+Card+Val-20:CD% a% score # ;
+Num+Card+Val-100:CD% hundred # ;
+Num+Card+Val-1000:CD% thousand # ;
+Num+Card+Val-1000000:CD% million # ;
+Num+Card+Val-1000000000:CD% milliard # ;
+Num+Card+Val-1000000000:CD% billion # ;
+Num+Card+Val-1000000000000000:CD% billiard # ;
+Num+Card+Val-1000000000000:CD% trillion # ;
+Num+Card+Val-1000000000000000:CD% quadrillion # ;
+Num+Card+Val-1000000000000000000:CD% quintillion # ;
+Num+Card+Val-1000000000000000000000:CD% trilliard # ;
+Num+Card+Val-1000000000000000000000:CD% sextillion # ;
+Num+Card+Indian+Val-10000000:CD% crore # ;
+Num+Card+Indian+Val-100000:CD% lakh # ;
+Num+Card+Digit:CD% Digits # ;
+Num+Card:CD% 1913 # ;
+Num+Card:CD% 71 # ;
+Num+Card:CD% 74 # ;
+Num+Card:CD% 637 # ;
+Num+Card:CD% 1937 # ;
+Num+Card:CD% 8 # ;
+Num+Card:CD% 87-31 # ;
+Num+Card:CD # ;
! TODO
+Num+Card+Gen:CD%$ # ; ! 1960's 1961's .404's
! TODO
!+Num+Card:CD% 29-5 1,119  7.5   125,000 1,700 60 100 ...
!+Num+Card:CD% 1,119  7.5  125,000 1,700 60 100 ...
!+Num+Card:CD% 7.5  125,000 1,700 60 100 ...
!+Num+Card:CD% 7.5  125,000 1,700 60 100 ...
!+Num+Card:CD% 125,000 1,700 60 100 ...
!+Num+Card:CD% 125,000 1,700 60 100 ...
!+Num+Card:CD% 125,000 1,700 60 100 ...
!
+Conj+Subord:CS% that # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% as # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% after # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% whether # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% before # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% while # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% like # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% because # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% if # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% since # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% for # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% than # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% altho # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% until # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% so # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% unless # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% though # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% providing # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% once # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% until # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% so # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% unless # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% though # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% providing # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% once # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% lest # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% s'posin' # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% till # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% whereas # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% whereupon # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% supposing # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% tho' # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% albeit # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% then # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% so's # ;
+Conj+Subord:CS% 'fore # ;
+Aux+Bare:DO% do # ;
+Aux+Bare+2P+Sg+Pres+Arch:DO% dost # ;
+Aux+Bare+Neg:DO*% don't # ;
do+Aux+Bare% you+Pron+2P:DO+PPSS% d'you # ;
+Aux+Finite+Past:DOD% did # ;
+Aux+Finite+PastPart:DOD% done # ;
+Aux+Finite+Past+Neg:DOD*% didn't # ;
+Aux+Finite+3P+Sg+Pres:DOZ% does # ;
+Aux+Finite+3P+Sg+Neg:DOZ*% doesn't # ;
+Aux+Finite+Neg:DOZ*% don't # ;
+Pron+Sg:DT% this # ;
+Pron+Sg:DT% each # ;
+Pron+Sg:DT% another # ;
+Pron+Sg:DT% that # ;
+Pron+Sg:DT% 'nother # ;
+Pron+Sg+Neg:DT$% another's # ;
thet+Pron+Sg% be+Aux+Finite+3P+Sg+Pres:DT+BEZ% that's # ;
that+Pron+Sg% will+Aux+Modal+Future:DT+MD% that'll # ;
this+Pron+Sg% will+Aux+Modal+Future:DT+MD% this'll # ;
+Pron+PreQuant:DTI% any # ;
+Pron+PreQuant:DTI% some # ;
+Pron+Pl:DTS% these # ;
+Pron+Pl:DTS% those # ;
+Pron+Pl:DTS% them # ;
them+Pron+Pl% be+Aux+Finite+3P+Sg:DTS+BEZ% them's # ;
+Pron+PreQuant+Neg:DTX% neither # ;
+Pron+PreQuant:DTX% either # ;
+Pron+PreQuant:DTX% one # ;
+Pron+Existential:EX% there
there+Pron+Existential% be+Aux+Finite+3P+Sg:EX+BEZ% there's # ;
there+Pron+Existential% have+Aux+Finite+Past:EX+HVD% there'd # ;
there+Pron+Existential% have+Aux+Finite+3P+Sg:EX+HVZ% there's # ;
there+Pron+Existential% will+Aux+Modal+Future:EX+MD% there'll # ;
there+Pron+Existential% would+Aux+Modal:EX+MD% there'd # ;
+Neg+Foreign+French:FW-*% pas # ;
+Neg+Foreign:FW-*% non # ;
+Neg+Foreign+French:FW-*% ne # ;
+Art+Fem+Sg+Foreign:FW-AT% la # ;
+Art+Foreign:FW-AT% le # ;
+Art+Masc+Sg+Foreign+Spanish:FW-AT% el # ;
+Art+Foreign:FW-AT% un # ;
+Art+Def+Foreign+German:FW-AT% die # ;
+Art+Def+Foreign+German:FW-AT% der # ;
+Art+Indef+Foreign+German:FW-AT% ein # ;
+Art+Foreign+German:FW-AT% keine # ;
+Art+Indef+Foreign+German:FW-AT% eine # ;
+Art+Def+Foreign+German:FW-AT% das # ;
+Art+Fem+Pl+Foreign:FW-AT% las # ;
+Art+Foreign:FW-AT% les # ;
+Art+Foreign:FW-AT% Il # ;
l'+Art+Foreign% +N+Common+Sg+Foreign:FW-AT+NN% l'orchestre l'identite l'arcade l'ange l'assistance l'activite L'Universite l'independance L'Union L'Unita l'osservatore	foreign word: article + noun, singular, common


LEXICON Digits
0 ;
1 ;
2 ;
3 ;
4 ;
5 ;
6 ;
7 ;
8 ;
9 ;


LEXICON Numerals9
+Val-1:one ;
+Val-2:two ;
+Val-3:three ;
+Val-4:four ;
+Val-5:five ;
+Val-6:six ;
+Val-7:seven ;
+Val-8:eight ;
+Val-9:nine ;


LEXICON NumeralTeens
+Val-20:twenty ;
+Val-30:thirty ;
+Val-40:forty ;
+Val-50:fifty ;
+Val-60:sixty ;
+Val-70:seventy ;
+Val-80:eighty ;
+Val-90:ninety ;
